Georgia statutes. TITLE 26 Food, Drugs, and Cosmetics
CHAPTER 3 Standards, Labeling, and Adulteration of Drugs and Cosmetics
26-3-22.
[Effective July 1, 2023. See note.] Other laws unaffected by chapter.

This chapter shall be cumulative and supplemental to any and all existing laws relating to the subject matter of drugs. Specifically, nothing contained in this chapter shall be so construed as to relieve any person, firm, or corporation from complying with any requirements as prescribed by Chapter 4 of this title, Article 3 of Chapter 13 of Title 16, the “Dangerous Drug Act,” Article 2 of Chapter 13 of Title 16, the “Georgia Controlled Substances Act,” or Title 21 C.F.R. 210, the federal “current good manufacturing practices in manufacturing, processing, packing, or holding of drugs: general.” Except that any testing equipment used to determine whether a controlled substance has been adulterated and contains a synthetic opioid shall not be considered a drug related object as defined by Article 2 of Chapter 13 of Title 16.

Nothing contained in this chapter shall amend, alter, supersede, or replace the laws of this state relative to feed, food, animal remedies, hog cholera serum or virus, drugs permitted to be added to feeds, bottling supplies, nor the duty and authority of the Commissioner of Agriculture.

History.

Code 1933, § 79A-1018, enacted by Ga. L. 1967, p. 296, § 1; Ga. L. 1986, p. 1555, § 8; Ga. L. 1999, p. 81, § 26; Ga. L. 2022, p. 809, § 8/HB 1175.

Delayed effective date.

Code Section 26-3-22 is set out twice in this Code. This version, as set out above, is effective July 1, 2023. For version effective until July 1, 2023, see the preceding version.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2023, added the last sentence in subsection (a).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2022, p. 809, § 1/HB 1175, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Georgia Raw Dairy Act.’”

26-3-23.
Penalty for impeding, obstructing, hindering, or preventing drug agent from performance of duty.

Any manufacturer, dealer, wholesaler, or other person who shall impede, obstruct, hinder, or otherwise prevent or attempt to prevent any drug agent or other person in the performance of his duty in collecting samples or otherwise in connection with this chapter shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1933, § 79A-9914, enacted by Ga. L. 1967, p. 296, § 1; Ga. L. 1977, p. 625, § 1.

26-3-24.
Penalty for violation of chapter.

Any person who violates this chapter shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1933, § 79A-9912, enacted by Ga. L. 1967, p. 296, § 1.